Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1688SV (2) 91 dg/ko S.F. 523 Section 1. Section 598.41, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . f. If the court finds by clear and 3 convincing evidence that it is in the best interest of the 4 child, the court may award separate rights and responsibilities 5 of joint legal custody to each parent under paragraph âaâ . 6 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. The district court shall resolve joint 7 legal custody disputes between parents during or after the 8 pendency of the parentsâ dissolution of marriage action. To 9 initiate the resolution of a dispute, a parent shall file an 10 application with the court and serve process on the other 11 parent. Upon receipt of the application, the court shall set 12 a hearing and expeditiously resolve the dispute in the best 13 interest of the child. A resolution of a dispute may award 14 each parent separate rights and responsibilities of joint legal 15 custody under paragraph âfâ . 16 NEW PARAGRAPH . h. During or after the pendency of a 17 dissolution of marriage action for the parents of a child, the 18 parents may stipulate to a parenting plan that includes the 19 allocation of parenting functions, parenting time, or both. 20 The court shall approve the parenting plan unless it finds the 21 agreement is not in the best interest of the child. 22